Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 3

Purchases and Contracts for Goods and Services

12-3-301. Written acquisition plan — Data relating to purchases and purchase estimates — Amendments to acquisition plan.

Before April 1 of each year, each state agency shall compile and submit to the chief procurement officer and the comptroller of the treasury, a written acquisition plan for the upcoming fiscal year forecasting the specific categories and quantities of goods and services anticipated for purchase by the state agency. The chief procurement officer shall develop procedures to ensure uniformity among the various state agencies both in the manner of calculating such forecasts and in the style and format used for submitting such written acquisition plans to the chief procurement officer. The information contained within such forecasts shall be based on good faith estimates and shall not be construed in any way to legally bind or authorize the state agency to make any purchase in conflict with the other requirements of this chapter.

This subsection (a) shall not apply to those entities exempt from this chapter pursuant to § 12-3-102.

Before July 1 of each year, the chief procurement officer shall compile and publish the written acquisition plans submitted by the various agencies pursuant to subsection (a), within an annual report that shall be entitled “The Forecast of Acquisition Plans for State Departments and Agencies for Fiscal Year _____—_____.” A copy of the report shall be posted on the central procurement office's website.

It is the duty of all state agencies to furnish to the central procurement office, upon request, data relating to purchases and purchase estimates.

An agency is permitted to amend or supplement its written acquisition plan before the end of a given fiscal year for unforeseen circumstances pursuant to rules, regulations and policies approved by the commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-133 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee education lottery corporation: contract amendments. OAG 10-73, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (5/21/10).

12-3-302. Bidding not to include statement that bidder willing to meet lowest bid price — Exception where negotiation permitted.

Any statement or agreement in which the respondent is asked to indicate a willingness to meet the low price, if such respondent is not the low respondent, is adverse to the competitive procurement standards and shall not be included in any solicitation to be awarded by any state agencies.

This section applies to divisible contracts.

This section shall not apply when applicable law permits negotiated contracts.

For the purposes of this section, contracts for the administration of specific service signs pursuant to title 54, chapter 5, part 11 shall not be negotiable.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-111 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-303. Execution of contracts by executive branch state agencies — Approval by chief procurement officer — Contracts for rendering public relations, advertising or related services — Applicability to various contracts — Posting of contracts on state procurement office’s website.

Any contract for goods or services entered into by an executive branch state agency shall be executed by the head of such state agency and approved by the chief procurement officer. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, approval of the chief procurement officer and no other officer of the state government is necessary, except as follows:

Contracts for financial management or accounting services shall also be approved by the commissioner of finance and administration;

Contracts for auditing services shall also be approved by the comptroller of the treasury;

Contracts for engineering or architectural services shall also be approved by the office of the state architect;

Contracts of the Tennessee higher education commission, the Tennessee student assistance corporation, and all state colleges and universities operated by the board of trustees of the University of Tennessee, the board of regents, and the state university boards do not need to be approved by the chief procurement officer; however, these contracts are subject to applicable provisions of the rules and policies promulgated by the central procurement office and approved by the procurement commission; or

Those procurements, contracts, grants, and other documents subject to approval by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 4-56-108 or otherwise required by law.

All contracts for rendering public relations, advertising or related services entered into by or on behalf of agencies and departments of the executive branch of state government shall be restricted to provide for only the rendition of media advertising and related design and production services, except as otherwise determined in accordance with policies established by the procurement commission.

This section shall not apply to construction and engineering contracts entered into by the department of transportation pursuant to title 54, chapter 5, or to contracts for projects required by law to be approved by the state building commission.

This section shall not apply to contracts to hire additional counsel for the state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies; provided, that all such contracts shall be made in accordance with § 8-6-106, except for legal counsel employed pursuant to any statute concerning the issuance and sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations.

This section shall not apply to contracts for procurement of services in connection with the issue, sale, purchase, and delivery of bonds, notes and other debt obligations or the administration, safekeeping, and payment after delivery of such debt obligations by the state or any of its agencies.

All contracts for goods and services shall be posted on the state procurement office's website, at a minimum providing the following information, as applicable, regarding each request for goods or services:

Business unit or agency requesting;

Contract number;

Brief description of the contract;

Type of contract;

Commencement date of the contract;

Ending date of the contract;

Maximum liability; and

Status of the contract.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18; 2020, ch. 794, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §§12-4-109 and12-4-110 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

For the Preamble to the act concerning HOPE Lottery Scholarships and the Tennessee Promise and Reconnect programs, see Acts 2020, ch. 794.

Acts 2020, ch. 794, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Financial Aid Simplification for Tennesseans (FAST) Act”.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a)(4), inserted “the Tennessee higher education commission, the Tennessee student assistance corporation, and”, substituted “University of Tennessee, the board of regents,” for “University of Tennessee or the state board of regents,”, inserted “, and the state university boards”, and substituted “however, these contracts” for “provided, that these contracts”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 794, § 70. August 1, 2020.

12-3-304. Unauthorized contracts void — Personal liability of officers and heads of agencies.

When any state agency required by this chapter to purchase goods or services through the central procurement office, contracts for the purchase of goods or services contrary to this chapter or the rules and regulations made hereunder, such contract shall be void and of no effect.

When the central procurement office contracts for the purchase of goods or services contrary to this chapter or the rules and regulations made hereunder, such contract shall also be void and of no effect.

If any state agency, including the central procurement office, purchases any goods or services contrary to this chapter or the rules and regulations made hereunder, then the chief procurement officer or head of such state agency shall be personally liable for the costs thereof, and if such goods or services are so unlawfully purchased and paid for out of state moneys, then the amount thereof may be recovered in the name of the state in an appropriate action instituted by the state.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-105 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-305. Responsibility for effective management of contracts — Adoption of regulations or policies that define service contracting fundamentals — Inclusion of the maximum liability or total estimated purchase in solicitations — Certification to state agencies the sources of services and supply and the contract price of the various goods and services covered by contracts.

The central procurement office or the procuring state governmental entity shall be responsible for the effective management of all contracts procured under its authority and shall adopt regulations or policies that define service contracting fundamentals. Such regulations or policies shall include, but are not limited to, contract management and monitoring of vendors, grants and sub-recipient relationships. The regulations for monitoring shall, at a minimum, require the filing of the monitoring plan with the chief procurement officer before any contracts are approved.

Any state agency, when entering into contracts with any organizations that agree to provide services to third parties, shall, subject to approval by the chief procurement officer and the comptroller of the treasury, establish guidelines for such organizations. These guidelines shall define the responsibility and prescribe procedures to be followed by the contracting agencies, including, but not limited to, the use of generally accepted accounting procedures, sound business practices, and compliance with related state and federal regulations regarding the fiscal policies of nonprofit organizations. The guidelines established shall be used as prerequisites for the state's agreement to provide matching or other state funds or federal funds or entering into a third party contract.

Every solicitation issued for the purpose of establishing a contract shall include the maximum liability or total estimated purchase by agencies of state government for the current contract period, if applicable, and for the new contract period. More than one (1) contract may be let for the supply of any given class or type of goods or services and any contract may provide for the cancellation thereof by either party. Contracts executed or proposed to be executed for periods of time of more than twelve (12) months shall be subject to the policies, rules and regulations of the central procurement office, as approved by the procurement commission, and shall meet the following conditions:

Such contracts may contain a provision giving the state the right of cancellation for convenience for periods of time established by the chief procurement officer;

Such contracts shall contain a provision giving the state the right of cancellation at the end of any fiscal year without notice, in the event that funds to support the contract become unavailable; and

No contract may be let for periods of time in excess of sixty (60) months, unless the chief procurement officer determines the contract is in the best interest of the state and approves the contract in accordance with rules and regulations, and policies and procedures approved by the procurement commission, as being in the best interest of the state.

After contracts have been awarded, the chief procurement officer shall certify to state agencies the sources of services and supply and the contract price of the various goods and services covered by the contracts. It is unlawful for any state agency to purchase any goods or services covered thereby from any sources other than those certified by the chief procurement officer, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §§12-3-112,12-3-203 and12-4-109(d) were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-306. Registration with the department of revenue to collect and remit sales and use taxes — Development of procedures for compliance.

A state governmental entity shall not contract to acquire goods or services, and no person may contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity, unless, prior to, or contemporaneous with, entering into the contract, the person contracting to supply goods or services and its affiliates register with the department of revenue to collect and remit the sales and use tax levied by the Retailers' Sales Tax Act, compiled in title 67, chapter 6. Nothing in this section shall require a person or affiliate to register if the person or affiliate does not make sales to customers in the state of tangible personal property or services, which if the sales occurred wholly within the state, would be taxable under title 67, chapter 6. This section is specifically applicable to foreign persons, notwithstanding the fact that such foreign persons or their affiliates may not otherwise be legally obligated to collect and remit such tax.

For purposes of this section:

“Affiliates” means each and every affiliate of the person contracting with the state or other state entities, as the term “affiliate” is defined in § 48-103-102;

“Other state entities” has the same meaning as in § 12-4-601; and

“Person” or “persons” has the same meaning as in § 67-6-102.

The commissioner of revenue and the chief procurement officer shall develop procedures for compliance with this section with approval by the procurement commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-120 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-307. Application of procedural and administrative accountability requirements to matching funds.

Contracting state agencies that establish the procedural and administrative accountability requirements shall apply these requirements to all matching funds. The established procedural and administrative requirements shall remain in effect for the entire fiscal year covered by the third party contract, and no contracting agency shall modify or amend these procedures without the state agency's approval.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-113 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-308. Contracts through or administered by social services agencies without discrimination — Religious organizations.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, state and local governments shall contract for goods and services provided through, or administered by, the departments of children's services, health, and human services without discrimination against religious organizations or discrimination based on race, age, color, sex, or national origin and shall provide beneficiaries of assistance under the programs established by law with forms of disbursement that are redeemable with these organizations that are awarded a contract. State and local governments may use any state, federal, local or other moneys available for these purposes.

State and local governments shall allow contracts with religious organizations to provide goods and services provided through, or administered by, the departments of children's services, health, and human services and to accept forms of disbursement under any program established on the same basis as any other nongovernmental provider without impairing the religious character of these organizations, and without diminishing the religious freedom of beneficiaries of assistance funded under these programs. The programs shall be implemented consistent with the first amendment of the United States Constitution. State and local governments shall not discriminate against an organization that is, or applies to be, a contractor to provide assistance or that accepts forms of disbursement on the basis that the organization has a religious character.

A religious organization with a contract described in this section shall retain its independence from federal, state and local governments, including the religious organization's control over the definition, development, practice and expression of its religious beliefs. State and local governments shall not require a religious organization to alter its form of internal governance or to remove religious art, icons, scripture or other symbols in order to be eligible to contract to provide assistance or to accept grants or other forms of disbursement funded under any program or public contract.

If a person, who applies for or receives goods, services or disbursements, objects to the religious character of the organization or institution from which the person receives, or would receive, assistance funded under any program, the state or local government shall provide the person, within a reasonable period of time after the date of the objection, with assistance from an alternative provider that is accessible to the person if an alternative provider is available and the value of which is not less than the value of assistance that the person would have received from the religious organization. Organizations shall provide notice to people receiving assistance of the right to object pursuant to this subsection (d).

A religious organization's exemption provided under § 702 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000e-1(a)), regarding employment practices is not affected by its participation in, or receipt of, moneys from programs described in this section. Nothing in this section allows religious organizations to discriminate in employment practices on the basis of race, age, color, sex or national origin.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a religious organization shall not discriminate against a person in regard to rendering assistance funded under any program described in this section on the basis of religion, a religious belief or refusal to participate in a religious practice, or on the basis of race, age, color, sex or national origin.

Except as provided in subsection (h), any religious organization that contracts to provide goods, services or assistance funded under any program is subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury, and is required to comply with the same rules and laws as other contractors to account in accordance with generally accepted auditing principles for the use of the moneys provided under the program.

If a religious organization segregates public moneys provided under these programs into separate accounts, only the programs funded by financial assistance provided with these moneys are subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury.

Appeals from the decisions of the head of a state agency, board or commission may be made to the commissioner of finance and administration in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

No moneys provided directly to institutions or organizations to provide services and administer programs under this section may be spent for sectarian worship, instruction or proselytization. This subsection (j) does not apply to the contracting for the services of chaplains by state and local governments.

For the purposes of this section, “state and local governments” means state agencies, boards and commissions and political subdivisions of this state.

No funds provided by any state or local government for goods and services to religious organizations shall supplant present funding of programs provided by such groups but shall be a supplement to the activities rendered by these groups.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-122 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-309. Prohibited contracts.

Prohibited contracts:

No state governmental entity shall contract to acquire goods or services from any person who knowingly utilizes the services of illegal immigrants in the performance of a contract for goods or services entered into with a state governmental entity;

No person may contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity if that person knowingly utilizes the services of illegal immigrants in the performance of a contract to supply goods or services entered into with the state or a state entity.

After January 1, 2007, no person may enter into a contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity without first attesting in writing that the person will not knowingly utilize the services of illegal immigrants in the performance of the contract, and will not knowingly utilize the services of any subcontractor who will utilize the services of illegal immigrants in the performance of the contract.

If any person who contracts to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity, or who submits a response to contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity, is discovered to have knowingly utilized the services of illegal immigrants in the performance of the contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity, the chief procurement officer shall declare that person to be prohibited from contracting for or submitting a response for any contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity for a period of one (1) year from the date of discovery of the usage of illegal immigrant services in the performance of a contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity.

Any person who is prevented from contracting for or submitting a response for a contract to supply goods or services to a state governmental entity for one (1) year pursuant to subsection (c) may appeal the imposition of the one-year prohibition by utilizing an appeals process to be established by the chief procurement officer and approved by the procurement commission.

The chief procurement officer is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section and shall be approved by the procurement commission. All rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-124 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-310. Definition of “call center” — Contracts for call center services.

As used in this section, “call center” includes a person who performs services, including, but not limited to, data entry services, electronic governmental transfers, or other electronic, telephone and telecommunication services.

The chief procurement officer shall promulgate regulations pursuant to title 4, chapter 56, authorizing a preference in the evaluation of proposals for state contracts requiring vendors of call center services to only employ, use, or contract with citizens of the United States who reside in the United States, or any person authorized to work in the United States pursuant to federal law, including legal resident aliens in the United States to provide call center services.

Any respondent seeking this preference shall supply such supporting documentation as the state may require and shall certify that it will provide services solely by citizens of the United States who reside within the United States, or persons authorized to work in the United States pursuant to federal law, including legal resident aliens in the United States. The certification shall acknowledge and confirm the right of the state to audit and monitor compliance and seek appropriate remedies for noncompliance.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 3, §§12-3-301 —12-3-314 (Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 18-20; 2000, ch. 722, § 1; 2004, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; T.C.A. §12-3-215; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning cost principles and audit, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 6 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-109(e) were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to title 12, ch. 3, part 6, and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-311. Certain noncompetitive purchases and contracts entered into by the department of transportation are subject to the approval of the comptroller of the treasury — Review by the fiscal review committee.

All noncompetitive purchases and contracts entered into by the department of transportation for nonconstruction and nonengineering projects or services with a term of more than one (1) year or which are renewable by either party that would extend the contract beyond twelve (12) months and which have a cumulative value of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), including all possible renewals, shall be subject to the approval of the comptroller of the treasury. A list of all such purchases and contracts shall be filed with and subject to review by the fiscal review committee.

Acts 2013, ch. 217, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

12-3-312. Contract Accountability and Responsible Employment (CARE) Act.

As used in this section, “state agency” also includes institutions of higher education. “State agency” does not include the department of treasury, the Tennessee financial literacy commission, the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, or any office of a constitutional officer of this state.

Prior to the procurement of a contract for services between a state agency and a private party in excess of two and one-half million dollars ($2,500,000) and that results in the layoff or furlough of one (1) or more state employees, the state agency shall produce an economic impact statement using professionally accepted methodologies. The economic impact statement must include the information identified in § 4-33-104(b).

An economic impact statement produced under subsection (b) must be submitted to the fiscal review committee for dissemination to the members of the general assembly no less than forty-five (45) days prior to the execution of the contract.

Upon receipt of an economic impact statement under subsection (c), the chair of the fiscal review committee may schedule a hearing to review the economic impact statement.

A state agency notified of a hearing conducted under subsection (d) shall provide the fiscal review committee, upon request, any information reasonably related to the proposed contract that the committee deems relevant; provided, that a state agency is not required to produce privileged information or any record that is not open for public inspection pursuant to state law.

Upon compliance with subsections (b) and (c), nothing in this section prohibits a state agency from executing a proposed contract for services that is subject to this section.

This section applies only to contracts procured on and after March 9, 2018, and does not apply to any contract for services executed on or before March 9, 2018, including, but not limited to, any option for renewal or extension of such contract.

Acts 2018, ch. 544, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 544, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Contract Accountability and Responsible Employment (CARE) Act.”